Arkansas, session 2025, HB1756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-16-1901(a), concerning the requirement
that students complete documented community service, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2026-2027, a public high
school student shall complete a minimum of seventy-five (75) clock hours of
documented community service in grades nine through twelve (9-12), as
certified by the service agency or organization with which the public school
student volunteers, in order to graduate.
(2)(A) The community service hours required under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section may be documented and maintained by the parent, legal
guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the student.
(B) The documentation of community service hours under
*TNL258*
04-09-2025 18:20:42 TNL258

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1756
subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section:
(i) Shall include an attestation by the parent,
legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the student that the
student obtained the community service hours that are documented; and
(ii) May be audited by the Department of Education
to ensure:
(a) The community service hours are being
properly documented and maintained; and
(b) The accuracy of the community service
hours that are being documented.

/s/Vaught
























04-09-2025 18:20:42 TNL258